Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Common Form

53-5-15.
Common or solemn form.

Probate of a will may be in common form or in solemn form or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-16.
Conclusiveness; persons protected if set aside.

The probate of a will in common form is not conclusive upon anyone interested in the estate adversely to the will except as provided in Code Section 53-5-19.

If set aside, probate of a will in common form does not protect the executor in any acts beyond the executor’s normal duties of collecting and preserving assets of the estate and paying the debts of the estate. Bona fide purchasers without notice under legally made sales from the executor will be protected.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

53-5-17.
Procedure.

A will may be proved in common form upon the testimony of a single subscribing witness and without service or notice to anyone. If the will is self-proved, compliance with signature requirements for execution is presumed and other requirements for execution are presumed without the testimony of any subscribing witness.

The petition to probate a will in common form shall set forth the same information required in a petition to probate a will in solemn form. The petition shall conclude with a prayer for the issuance of letters testamentary.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-19/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “service or” in the first sentence in subsection (a).

53-5-18.
Court order.

The order to probate a will in common form may be granted by the probate court at any time.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-19.
When conclusive upon parties in interest.

Probate in common form shall become conclusive upon all parties in interest four years from the date the order admitting such will to probate in common form is entered by the court in such proceeding, except upon minor heirs who require proof in solemn form and interpose a caveat within four years after reaching the age of majority. In such case, if the will is refused probate in solemn form and no prior will is admitted to probate, an intestacy shall be declared only as to the minor or minors and not as to others whose right to caveat is barred by the lapse of time.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-20/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “date the order admitting such will to probate in common form is entered by the court in such proceeding” for “time of probate” in the first sentence of this Code section.